District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.03a

Fire safety requirements for high-rise buildings.

(a)

The owner of a high-rise building shall:

(1)

Prepare and maintain a fire safety and evacuation plan for the building; and

(2)

Conduct fire drills at least once every 12 months.

(b)

A violation of this section shall be subject to civil penalties as established by the Mayor pursuant to rulemaking.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “high-rise building” shall mean any building having occupied floors more than 75 feet above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access.

Mar. 19, 1906, ch. 957, § 3a
as added Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-116, § 2, 57 DCR 893
Delegation of Authority under the Fire Alarm Notice and Tenant Fire Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2009-101, June 12, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6844).